Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 5 Compensation and Benefits
GS11 L095C ADH HOSPITAL & REGULATORY MANAGER GS11 M001C DCC TREATMENT ADMINISTRATOR GS11 M005C DHS ASSISTANT SUPERINTENDENT — CONWAY GS11 N149N ADE COORD FISCAL DISTRESS GS11 N153N DHS/DBHS CLINICAL DIRECTOR GS11 N176N EXEC DIR COUNSELING BRD GS11 N203N ADEQ DIRECTOR OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES GS11 P001C AETN PRODUCTION DIVISION DIRECTOR GS11 P002C AEDC DIRECTOR FILM COMMISSION GS11 P003C DAH AGENCY DIRECTOR GS11 P005N DIS TESTING EVAL PLANTS POLICY COORD GS11 P076C AEDC DIGITAL MARKETING DIRECTOR GS11 R012C DFA ASSISTANT STATE PAYROLL MANAGER GS11 R013C AGENCY HUMAN RESOURCES MANAGER GS11 R041C DFA STATEWIDE PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS11 S002C AETN OPERATIONS DIVISION DIRECTOR GS11 T004C DCC PROGRAM ADMR PAROLE & PROBATION SVCS GS11 T009C ASP SPECIAL OPERATIONS ADMINISTRATOR GS11 T011C ASP SERGEANT GS11 T016C CLEST DEPUTY DIRECTOR ACADEMY OPERATIONS GS11 U127U EXEC DIR DEVLPMTL DISABILITIES COUNCIL GS11 X007C DHS/DYS ADMIN PROG COMPLIANCE GS11 X011C ASP/CACD INVESTIGATOR ADMINISTRATOR GS11 X015C SECURITIES EXAMINER SUPERVISOR GS11 X033C PSC SENIOR PUBLIC UTILITY AUDITOR GS11 A023C PHARMACY BOARD CHIEF FISCAL OFFICER GS10 A025N OAL FINANCIAL ANALYST GS10 A036C ADPT REV OPERATIONS MANAGER GS10 A040C ADFA FISCAL PROGRAM MANAGER GS10 A044C AUDIT COORDINATOR GS10 A058C DFA CAFR ACCOUNTANT GS10 A106C BANK SENIOR EXAMINER GS10 A118C FINANCIAL EXAMINER SPECIALIST GS10 A125C DFA REVENUE TAX SPECIALIST GS10 A138C ADEQ TIRE FUND COORDINATOR GS10 B018C SENIOR BROADCAST ENGINEER GS10 B022C DISTRICT FORESTER GS10 B027C PARK SUPERINTENDENT V GS10 B128C METROLOGY LABORATORY MANAGER GS10 C112C ADC POLICY & RESEARCH COORDINATOR GS10 D018C DIS INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORD GS10 D031C DISASTER RECOVERY ANALYST GS10 D115C HIT BUSINESS COORDINATOR GS10 E005C REHAB DIRECTOR OF VOCATIONAL TRAINING GS10 E007C ADE OERZ DIRECTOR GS10 E010C DHS/DYS EDUCATION MANAGER GS10 E012C STATE LIBRARY DIVISION MANAGER GS10 E013C EDUCATION PROGRAM MANAGER GS10 E014C AETN PROGRAM AND SERVICES DIV MANAGER GS10 E016C PUBLIC SCHOOL PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS10 E017C ASST PRINCIPAL GS10 E059C ADE COORDINATOR OF NUTRITION SERVICES GS10 E061C ACE PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS10 E063C AETN PROFESSIONAL RELATIONS DIRECTOR GS10 E071C AMMONIA & INDUSTRIAL TRAINER GS10 G036C ABA DIVISION MANAGER GS10 G040C REHAB DIRECTOR — SPECIAL PROGRAMS GS10 G041C ATRS MEMBER SERVICES ADMINISTRATOR GS10 G046C DCC PLANNING & MGMT SVCS ADMINISTRATOR GS10 G050C ADE APSCN DIVISION MANAGER GS10 G051C ADE ACADEMIC FACILITIES SR PROJECT ADMIN GS10 G060N OAL PRODUCT MANAGER GS10 G061C ACD DEPUTY DIRECTOR GS10 G063C ADEQ BRANCH MANAGER GS10 G065C PUBLIC DEFENDER ATTORNEY I GS10 G068C DWS AREA OPERATIONS CHIEF GS10 G069C DIS QUALITY ASSURANCE LEAD GS10 G071C DHE PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS10 G073C ATTORNEY GS10 G075C ADE PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR GS10 G076C ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES MANAGER GS10 G085C DDSSA PROFESSIONAL RELATIONS MGR GS10 G097C SBEC DEPUTY DIRECTOR GS10 G100C DHS COUNTY ADMINISTRATOR III GS10 G112C DDSSA UNIT SUPERVISOR GS10 G156C ASP PROGRAM MANAGER GS10 G223C DFA OCSE DIVISION MANAGER GS10 G226C DFA OCSE PROGRAM MANAGER GS10 G246C ATC BRANCH MANAGER GS10 G254C ADVA DIVISION MANAGER GS10 G258C DDSSA HEARING OFFICER GS10 G259C INSURANCE PROGRAM MANAGER GS10 G263C PUBLIC DEFENDER GS10 G268C PSC MOTOR CARRIER ASST. DIV. DIRECTOR GS10 L004C REHAB DIRECTOR — PROG, PLAN, DEV & EVAL GS10 L010C DHS DMS MEDICAL ASSISTANCE MANAGER GS10 L014C HIPAA PROGRAM CONSULTANT GS10 L016C ADH PUBLIC HEALTH ADMINISTRATOR GS10 L025C ADH PUBLIC HEALTH SECTION CHIEF III GS10 L030C ADH DISTRICT MANAGER GS10 L099C EPIDEMIOLOGY SUPERVISOR GS10 M006C ADH SOC SVC PROGRAM DIRECTOR GS10 N155N CAPITOL ZONING DISTRICT ADMINISTRATOR GS10 N169N MOTOR VEHICLE COMMISSION DIRECTOR GS10 P067C ASP PUBLIC INFORMATION OFFICER GS10 P074C AID PUBLIC INFORMATION OFFICER GS10 R010C DFA SENIOR STATE PERSONNEL ANALYST GS10 R011C DFA SENIOR STATE BUDGET ANALYST GS10 R049C DHS EMPLOYEE RELATIONS COORD GS10 T015C ADC/DCC DEPUTY WARDEN GS10 T024C ASP/CACD HOTLINE ADMINISTRATOR GS10 T025C ALETA TRAINING SUPV GS10 T110C AGRI LAW ENFORCEMENT CHIEF GS10 V036C AGENCY PROCUREMENT ADMINISTRATOR GS10 X009C INSURANCE DEPT DIR OF SECURITY OPS GS10 X013C ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH MANAGER GS10 X021C BD OF ACCT INVESTIGATOR GS10 X025C DCC PAROLE/PROBATION AREA MANAGER GS10 X027C DENTAL EXAMINERS BD EXEC DIR GS10 X203C DDSSA QUALITY ASSURANCE SPECIALIST GS10 X207C DDSSA ADJUDICATOR V GS10 A029C DIS FISCAL MANAGER GS09 A032C ADE FINANCE PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS09 A034C RETIREMENT SECTION MANAGER GS09 A037C INVESTMENT MANAGER GS09 A038C FISCAL SUPPORT MANAGER GS09 A042C INSURANCE SENIOR EXAMINER GS09 A046C PSC RATE CASE ANALYST GS09 A050C AGENCY FISCAL MANAGER GS09 A051C ADFA FINANCE PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS09 A052C ACCOUNTING COORDINATOR GS09 A054C TAX AUDITOR II GS09 B021C LICENSED ARCHITECT GS09 B029C AGRI PLANT BOARD DIVISION MGR GS09 B030C FORENSIC SCIENTIST COORDINATOR GS09 B031C PARK SUPERINTENDENT IV GS09 B034C MICROBIOLOGIST SUPERVISOR GS09 B035C GEOLOGY SUPERVISOR GS09 B037C CHEMIST SUPERVISOR GS09 B038C STATE FOREST MANAGER GS09 B041C STATE CLIMATOLOGIST GS09 B042C ENGINEER GS09 B044C HEALTH PHYSICIST SUPERVISOR GS09 B045C BIOLOGIST SUPERVISOR GS09 B047C ADH LABORATORY MANAGER GS09 B135C HATCHERY MANAGER GS09 B136C AGRI LAB QUALITY MANAGER GS09 C001C STADIUM COMMISSION ASST MANAGER/ADMR GS09 C100C ADPT RESEARCH PROJECT COORDINATOR GS09 C108C ADEM DIVISION DIRECTOR GS09 C109C ASP CACD AREA MANAGER GS09 C110C ASP FLEET ADMINISTRATOR GS09 C111C EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR AUCTIONEER BOARD GS09 E011C VOCATIONAL EDUCATION COORDINATOR GS09 E015C SPECIAL EDUCATION SUPERVISOR GS09 E019C PUBLIC SCHOOL PROGRAM ADVISOR GS09 E021C STATE LIBRARY MANAGER GS09 E022C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION MANAGER GS09 E024C TEACHER SUPERVISOR GS09 E025C EDUCATIONAL SPECIALIST GS09 E036C CERTIFIED MASTERS DEGREE LIBRARIAN GS09 E062C ACE PROGRAM ADVISOR GS09 G039C SENIOR TRANSPORTATION MANAGER GS09 G045C DFA DIVISION MANAGER III GS09 G070C DIRECTOR OF FIELD OPERATIONS GS09 G074C ADE COORD OF GOVERNMENTAL AFFAIRS GS09 G078C ADPT PRG SVS ADMIN GS09 G080C NATIONAL & COMMUNITY SERVICES EXEC DIR GS09 G087C ADEM PREPAREDNESS DIVISION DIRECTOR GS09 G088C ADEM DISASTER MGMT DIV DIR GS09 G089C ADEM ADMINISTRATION DIVISION DIRECTOR GS09 G090C ADE AREA PROJECT MANAGER GS09 G095C LODGE MANAGER GS09 G096C LABOR DIVISION MANAGER GS09 G098C DIS QUALITY ASSURANCE COORDINATOR GS09 G099C DHS PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR GS09 G102C DHE PROGRAM SPECIALIST GS09 G104C AEDC AREA/PROGRAM REPRESENTATIVE GS09 G109C GRANTS MANAGER GS09 G110C DWS PROGRAM MANAGER GS09 G111C DHS COUNTY ADMINISTRATOR II GS09 G113C DDSSA HEARING OFFICER COORDINATOR GS09 G167C KEEP ARKANSAS BEAUTIFUL DIRECTOR GS09 G222C ADC/DCC INTERNAL AFFAIRS ADMINISTRATOR GS09 G224C DFA OCSE FIELD MANAGER GS09 G238C LOCAL HEALTH UNIT ADMINISTRATOR III GS09 G241C HEALTH INFO TECH OPER & TECH OFFICER GS09 G243C DWS FIELD MANAGER III GS09 G288C DWS DIVISION MANAGER GS09 G289C ADEM DIVISION DIRECTOR GS09 L007C ASBN PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS09 L012C ASD SPECIALTY PROGRAM DIRECTOR GS09 L021C NURSING HOME ASSISTANT ADMINISTRATOR GS09 L023C HEALTH FACILITIES SUPERVISOR GS09 L024C DHS BEHAV HLTH FACILITY ADMIN GS09 L028C EPIDEMIOLOGIST GS09 L029C ADH PUBLIC HEALTH SECTION CHIEF II GS09 L033C PSYCHOLOGICAL EXAMINER GS09 L037C REHAB AREA MANAGER GS09 L040C DIETARY SERVICES DIRECTOR GS09 M008C YOUTH PROGRAM DIRECTOR GS09 M009C LICENSED CERTIFIED SOCIAL WORKER GS09 M011C FAMILY SERVICE WORKER COUNTY SUPERVISOR GS09 M013C SPINAL CORD COMMISSION CLIENT SVS ADMIN GS09 M014C PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY COORDINATOR III GS09 P004C PUBLIC INFORMATION MANAGER GS09 P006C DAH AGENCY ASSISTANT DIRECTOR GS09 P007C AETN CHIEF POST PRODUCTION EDITOR GS09 R009C ADE BUDGET MANAGER GS09 R015C DWS EQUAL OPPORTUNITY MANAGER GS09 R019C BUDGET MANAGER GS09 R043C DFA STATEWIDE PROGRAM SPECIALIST GS09 S005C AVIATION MANAGER GS09 T006C ADC HEAD FARM MANAGER II GS09 T018C HE PUBLIC SAFETY COMMANDER III GS09 T022C ASP CORPORAL GS09 T027C ADC/DCC TRAINING ADMINISTRATOR GS09 T029C CLEST SENIOR AGENT GS09 T033C ADC/DCC MAJOR GS09 T106C DFA REVENUE SECURITY SUPERVISOR GS09 T108C ATC CHIEF CRIMINAL INVESTIGATIONS SUPV GS09 T112C DCC DIVISION MANAGER GS09 V034C DFA STATEWIDE PROCUREMENT COORDINATOR GS09 X012C ADE PLSB CHIEF INVESTIGATOR GS09 X014C TOBACCO SETTLEMENT COMMISSION DIRECTOR GS09 X022C BAIL BONDSMAN BOARD EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR GS09 X032C SENIOR SECURITIES EXAMINER GS09 X038C QUALITY ASSURANCE MANAGER GS09 X069C DFA HORSE RACING SUPERVISOR GS09 X190C DDSSA ADJUDICATOR IV GS09 X216C PSC PIPELINE SAFETY COORDINATOR GS09 A022C STUDENT LOAN FINANCE SPECIALIST GS08 A026N OAL AUDITOR GS08 A041C PROGRAM FISCAL MANAGER GS08 A045C STATISTICAL ANALYSIS MANAGER GS08 A047C FINANCIAL ANALYST II GS08 A049C DFA REVENUE OFFICE DISTRICT MANAGER GS08 A056C DHS FINANCIAL SECTION MANAGER GS08 A057C DFA TAX RESEARCH ANALYST GS08 A060C SENIOR AUDITOR GS08 A061C RETIREMENT INVESTMENT SPECIALIST GS08 A062C RETIREMENT COORDINATOR GS08 A066C INTERNAL AUDITOR GS08 A068C DIS BILLING SERVICES MANAGER GS08 A070C BANK EXAMINER GS08 A071C ADFA FINANCE PROGRAM ANALYST GS08 A082C ACCOUNTANT II GS08 A105C JDDC FISCAL MANAGER GS08 A113C OMIG SR. AUDITOR GS08 A116C BUSINESS OPERATIONS MANAGER GS08 A120C OAL ACCOUNTANT GS08 A123C OAL COLLECTIONS SPECIALIST GS08 B024C CONSERVATION PROGRAM MANAGER GS08 B025C AERONAUTICS ASSISTANT DIRECTOR GS08 B032C CHIEF PARK PLANNER GS08 B043C PROFESSIONAL GEOLOGIST GS08 B048C PARK SUPERINTENDENT III GS08 B049C AGRI PROGRAM MANAGER GS08 B050C OIL & GAS DISTRICT PETROLEUM SUPERVISOR GS08 B053C FORENSIC SCIENTIST GS08 B055C ECOLOGIST COORDINATOR GS08 B057C VETERINARY BOARD EXEC SECRETARY GS08 B058C STAFF FORESTER GS08 B063C HEALTH PHYSICIST GS08 B067C ARCHAEOLOGIST GS08 B079C HEALTH FACILITY LABORATORY SURVEYOR GS08 B084C AGS SUPERVISOR GS08 B126C SENIOR CHEMIST GS08 B127C SENIOR MICROBIOLOGIST GS08 C004C AREC SUPERVISOR GS08 C101C ADPT WELCOME CENTER ADMINISTRATOR GS08 C106C OAL OFFICE COORDINATOR GS08 C107C OMIG MEDICAL REVIEW OFFICER GS08 D041C DIS TECHNICAL ACCOUNTS SPECIALIST GS08 E018C SPECIALIZED TECHNICAL FACULTY GS08 E020C ADE OERZ TECHNICAL ASSIST SPECIALIST GS08 E023C TRAINING PROJECT MANAGER GS08 E026C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION COORDINATOR GS08 E029C SIGN LANGUAGE COORDINATOR GS08 E030C LIBRARY COORDINATOR GS08 E031C EDUCATION PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS08 E035C CERTIFIED MASTERS TEACHER GS08 E066C DCCECE EDUCATION MANAGER GS08 G064C SR HLTH INSURANCE INFORMATION PRG MGR GS08 G079C OUTDOOR REC GRANTS PRGM DIR GS08 G081C DWS DIVISION CHIEF GS08 G083C DHS/DAAS DIVISION MANAGER GS08 G084C DFA DIVISION MANAGER II GS08 G086C ASP PROGRAM ASST ADMINISTRATOR GS08 G091C ADPT MARKETING & PROMOTION DIR GS08 G092C PUBLIC DEFENDER PROGRAM MANAGER GS08 G093C OPERATIONS MANAGER GS08 G105C ADPT DEVELOPMENT MANAGER GS08 G106C WCC CLAIMS SPECIALIST GS08 G107C WCC PROGRAM MANAGER GS08 G108C PUBLIC DEF OMBUDSMAN COORDINATOR GS08 G114C DWS WORKFORCE INVEST REG ADVISOR GS08 G115C ASST DIR OF RURAL SERVICES GS08 G116C LOCAL HEALTH UNIT ADMINISTRATOR II GS08 G119C SBEC EDUCATIONAL SERVICES MANAGER GS08 G121C REHAB PROGRAM MANAGER GS08 G126C FINANCE PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS08 G127C DWS PROGRAM OPERATIONS MANAGER GS08 G128C DWS FIELD MANAGER II GS08 G129C DHS/DCO PROGRAM MANAGER GS08 G130C DHS COUNTY ADMINISTRATOR I GS08 G137C AEDC RESEARCH PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS08 G139C ADEQ FACILITY SUPPORT SVCS MANAGER GS08 G140C ADEM PROGRAM MANAGER GS08 G152C DHS PROGRAM MANAGER GS08 G227C DFA OCSE PROGRAM SUPERVISOR GS08 G251C OMIG PROGRAM MANAGER GS08 G252C VETERANS SERVICE PROGRAM MANAGER GS08 G264C DHS FAIRNESS OFFICER GS08 L018C REHAB ASST DIRECTOR — ACTI GS08 L034C NUTRITIONIST SUPERVISOR GS08 L035C NUTRITIONIST CONSULTANT GS08 L041C ADC ASST MEDICAL PROGRAM MANAGER GS08 L043C HEALTH PROGRAM SPECIALIST III GS08 L047C MEDICAL TECHNOLOGIST SUPERVISOR GS08 L050C CERTIFIED RESPIRATORY THERAPY TECHNICIAN GS08 L059C ABSLPA DIRECTOR GS08 L091C ADH PUBLIC HEALTH SECTION CHIEF I GS08 L098C CERTIFIED VOCATIONAL REHAB COUNSELOR GS08 M007C DCC ASST TREATMENT PROGRAM MGR GS08 M010C FAMILY SERVICE WORKER CLINICAL SPEC GS08 M012C YOUTH PROGRAM MANAGER GS08 M015C FAMILY SERVICE WORKER SUPERVISOR GS08 M016C DHS FIELD MANAGER GS08 M018C PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY COORDINATOR II GS08 M020C LICENSED PROFESSIONAL COUNSELOR GS08 M021C DCC TREATMENT SUPERVISOR GS08 M031C ADMINISTRATOR OF CHAPLAINCY SVCS GS08 M088C LICENSED MASTER SOCIAL WORKER GS08 P005C DHE COMMUNICATIONS COORDINATOR GS08 P009C TELEVISION PRODUCTION MANAGER GS08 P010C EXHIBITS COORDINATOR GS08 P014C MUSEUM MANAGER GS08 R014C PERSONNEL MANAGER GS08 R016C DFA STATE PERSONNEL ANALYST GS08 R017C DFA STATE BUDGET ANALYST GS08 R021C BUDGET ANALYST GS08 R028C DFA STATEWIDE PAYROLL SYSTEMS SPECIALIST GS08 R042C DFA CAFR ASSET SPECIALIST GS08 S003C FOOD & BEVERAGE DIRECTOR GS08 S004C MAINTENANCE MANAGER GS08 S007C DIRECTOR HVACR SECTION GS08 S010C ADC INDUSTRY PROGRAM MANAGER GS08 S094C ADC CONSTRUCTION/MAINTENANCE COORD GS08 T019C DIRECTOR OF PUBLIC SAFETY I GS08 T021C ADC HEAD FARM MANAGER I GS08 T023C HE PUBLIC SAFETY COMMANDER II GS08 T031C DHS BEHAV HLTH PUBLIC SAFETY DIR GS08 T034C WORK RELEASE CENTER SUPERVISOR GS08 T035C ASP TROOPER 1ST CLASS GS08 T042C ADPT CHIEF RANGER GS08 T048C ADC/DCC CAPTAIN GS08 T104C ADC/DCC TRAINING ACADEMY SUPERVISOR GS08 T107C CLEST AGENT GS08 V002C FEDERAL SURPLUS PROPERTY MANAGER GS08 V004C PROCUREMENT MANAGER GS08 V007C PROCUREMENT COORDINATOR GS08 V032C DFA OSP SURPLUS PROPERTY MANAGER GS08 V035C DFA STATEWIDE PROCUREMENT SPECIALIST GS08 X016C MANUFACTURED HOMES COMMISSION DIRECTOR GS08 X017C INSURANCE LICENSING MANAGER GS08 X018C INSURANCE CONSUMER PROTECTION MANAGER GS08 X020C BURIAL ASSOCIATION BD EXEC SEC GS08 X026C CRIMINAL DETENTION FACILITIES COORD GS08 X030C REGULATORY BOARD CHIEF INVESTIGATOR GS08 X034C PREPAID FUNERAL MANAGER GS08 X035C ASP/CACD AREA MANAGER GS08 X037C EDUCATION INVESTIGATOR GS08 X039C DIRECTOR OF COSMETOLOGY BOARD GS08 X042C DCC PAROLE/PROBATION ASST AREA MGR GS08 X043C ADH ENVIRONMENTAL SUPV GS08 X044C ADH DIR PLUMBING INSPECTIONS GS08 X046C ACD DIVISION ADMINISTRATOR GS08 X050C PHYSICAL THERAPY BD EXEC DIR GS08 X051C LABOR MEDIATOR GS08 X052C LABOR INSPECTOR SUPERVISOR GS08 X062C QUALITY ASSURANCE COORDINATOR GS08 X064C PSC PUBLIC UTILITY AUDITOR GS08 X067C HEALTH FACILITIES SURVEYOR GS08 X070C DDSSA FRAUD INVESTIGATOR GS08 X071C DDSSA CLAIMS ADJUDICATOR III GS08 X072C CRIMINAL INSURANCE FRAUD INVESTIGATOR GS08 X073C CONTRACTORS BOARD INVESTIGATOR GS08 X135C SOCIAL WORK LICENSING BD EXEC DIR GS08 X148C AIRCRAFT PILOT GS08 X192C ASST DIRECTOR FRAUD INVESTIGATION GS08 X202C ADE PLSB SENIOR INVESTIGATOR GS08 X211C OAL SENIOR SECURITY SPECIALIST GS08 X215C DFA ABC ENFORCEMENT OFFICER SUPERVISOR GS08 A055C DHS INSTITUTION BUSINESS MANAGER GS07 A059C TAX AUDITOR GS07 A063C RESEARCH & STATISTICS SUPERVISOR GS07 A064C PSC TAX VALUATION SUPERVISOR GS07 A065C PAYROLL SERVICES COORDINATOR GS07 A067C INSURANCE EXAMINER GS07 A069C DFA REVENUE OFFICE ASST DISTRICT MANAGER GS07 A072C RESEARCH & STATISTICS MANAGER GS07 A073C PROGRAM/FIELD AUDITOR SUPERVISOR GS07 A075C FINANCIAL ANALYST I GS07 A076C FINANCE PROGRAM ANALYST GS07 A078C RETIREMENT COUNSELOR GS07 A079C INVESTMENT ANALYST GS07 A081C AUDITOR GS07 A085C DWS SR FIELD TAX REPRESENTATIVE GS07 A089C ACCOUNTANT I GS07 A109C DFA SEFA / CAFR SPECIALIST GS07 B051C GEOLOGIST GS07 B052C FORENSIC SPECIALIST GS07 B054C CAMPUS CONSTRUCTION COORDINATOR GS07 B060C LAND RESOURCE SPECIALIST SUPERVISOR GS07 B061C RESEARCH TECHNOLOGIST GS07 B062C FOREST HEALTH SPECIALIST GS07 B065C ECOLOGIST GS07 B066C BIOLOGIST SPECIALIST GS07 B068C ADEQ ECOLOGIST GS07 B071C PARK SUPERINTENDENT II GS07 B072C AGRI PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS07 B074C SURVEYOR GS07 B075C PARK PLANNER GS07 B077C MICROBIOLOGIST GS07 B080C FORESTER GS07 B081C CHEMIST GS07 B082C BIOLOGIST GS07 B132C ASSISTANT HATCHERY MANAGER GS07 B137C CRIME LAB PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS07 C003C STADIUM COMMISSION MARKETING/EVENT MGR GS07 C009C HEARING REPORTER GS07 C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR GS07 C011C BD OF ARCH ADMIN ASST/OFFICE MGR GS07 C015C AGRI ADMINISTRATIVE COORDINATOR GS07 C031C ENG & LAND SURVEYORS ASST EXEC DIRECTOR GS07 D053C DIS ACCOUNT ANALYST GS07 E027C CAREER & TECHNICAL FACULTY GS07 E032C EDUCATION COUNSELOR GS07 E040C STAFF DEVELOPMENT COORDINATOR GS07 E041C SENIOR LIBRARIAN GS07 E042C PUBLIC HEALTH EDUCATOR SUPERVISOR GS07 E048C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION SPECIALIST GS07 E064C CERTIFIED PUBLIC HEALTH EDUCATOR GS07 E065C CANCER INFORMATION MANAGEMENT SPECIALIST GS07 G082C DHS/DYS ADMISSIONS EVALUATOR GS07 G120C RISK CONSULTANT GS07 G125C INSURANCE SPECIAL PROJECTS COORDINATOR GS07 G131C DHS BEHAV HLTH MED BUS PRACTICES ADMIN GS07 G132C DFA PROGRAM MANAGER GS07 G133C DFA DIVISION MANAGER I GS07 G138C AGENCY ADMINISTRATIVE REVIEW OFFICER GS07 G142C ADC CLASSIFICATION ADMINISTRATOR GS07 G143C LOCAL HEALTH UNIT ADMINISTRATOR I GS07 G144C TECHNICAL INSTITUTE PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS07 G145C RURAL CONST GRANT/FINANCIAL OFFICER GS07 G146C MITIGATION SPECIALIST GS07 G147C GRANTS COORDINATOR GS07 G148C ENERGY PROGRAM MANAGER GS07 G149C DWS FIELD MANAGER I GS07 G151C DHS/DCO COUNTY SUPERVISOR GS07 G153C DHS/DAAS PROGRAM SUPERVISOR GS07 G154C DCC PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS07 G155C DAH PROGRAM MANAGER GS07 G157C ADEM AREA COORDINATOR GS07 G158C ACIC PROGRAM MANAGER GS07 G159C DEPARTMENT BUSINESS COORDINATOR GS07 G163C REHAB PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS07 G164C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO COMMISSIONER GS07 G165C ADPT SPECIALTY OPERATIONS MANAGER GS07 G168C INDUSTRIAL CONSULTANT GS07 G173C ADFA PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS07 G176C VOLUNTEER PROGRAM MANAGER GS07 G181C DWS PROGRAM MONITOR GS07 G182C DHS/DDS PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS07 G183C DHS PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS07 G196C DWS SATELLITE OFFICE SUPERVISOR GS07 G209C DWS PROGRAM SUPERVISOR GS07 G244C ASBMT EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR GS07 G248C ENERGY PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS07 G253C VETERANS SERVICE OFFICER GS07 G260C OAL MARKETING SALES REP GS07 G265C SENIOR TECHNICAL WRITER GS07 G267C DHS PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY ANALYST GS07 L039C NUTRITIONIST GS07 L048C HEALTH PROGRAM SPECIALIST II GS07 L049C DISEASE INTERVENTION SPEC SUPV GS07 L052C REHAB FACILITY SUPERVISOR GS07 L054C EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES SUPV GS07 L055C DIETICIAN GS07 L057C REHAB SVS FACILITY SPECIALIST GS07 L061C MEDICAL TECHNOLOGIST GS07 L062C LICENSED PRACTICAL NURSE SUPERVISOR GS07 L064C RADIOLOGY TECHNICIAN GS07 L101C ENTOMOLOGIST GS07 M017C CHILD ABUSE & NEGLECT PREVENTION BD DIR GS07 M019C MILITARY HOUSING DIRECTOR GS07 M023C SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM COORD GS07 M024C RESIDENTIAL SERVICES MANAGER GS07 M025C PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY COORDINATOR I GS07 M026C LICENSED SOCIAL WORKER GS07 M027C FAMILY SERVICE WORKER SPECIALIST GS07 M029C CHILD SUPPORT SUPERVISOR II GS07 M032C VOCATIONAL REHAB PLACEMENT SPEC GS07 M037C PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY SUPERVISOR GS07 M039C MEDICAID SERVICES SUPERVISOR GS07 M040C FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS07 M042C DHS STAFF SUPERVISOR GS07 M043C DDS PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS07 M046C ADC/DCC TREATMENT COORDINATOR GS07 M049C SENIOR CHAPLAIN GS07 P008C TELEVISION PROGRAM MANAGER GS07 P012C TELEVISION PRODUCER GS07 P013C PUBLIC INFORMATION COORDINATOR GS07 P015C DAH MANAGER OF HISTORIC PROPERTIES GS07 P016C CURATOR GS07 P018C ARCHIVAL MANAGER GS07 P020C PRODUCTION ARTIST GS07 P025C SUPERVISOR OF INTERPRETIVE PROGRAMS GS07 P030C MUSEUM EXHIBIT PROGRAM SPECIALIST GS07 P032C DESIGN CONSULTANT GS07 P038C HISTORIAN GS07 P068C RADIO PRODUCER GS07 P069C OAL GRAPHIC SPECIALIST GS07 P070C OAL OFFICE CAMPAIGN COORDINATOR GS07 P072C OAL PUBLICATION SPECIALIST GS07 R018C DFA EBD PROGRAM SUPERVISOR GS07 R024C ASSISTANT PERSONNEL MANAGER GS07 S008C CAMPUS MAINTENANCE SUPERVISOR GS07 S015C ASST LODGE MANAGER GS07 S017C MAINTENANCE COORDINATOR GS07 S019C DIRECTOR MAINTENANCE GS07 S096C ADC CONSTRUCTION PROJECT SUPERVISOR GS07 S106C LICENSED TRADESMAN GS07 T030C PUBLIC SAFETY COMMANDER I GS07 T032C DFA REVENUE SECURITY COORDINATOR GS07 T036C MILITARY FACILITIES SUPERVISOR GS07 T043C MILITARY DEPUTY FIRE CHIEF GS07 T044C IA SUPERVISOR GS07 T045C DCC PAROLE/PROBATION OFFICER GS07 T054C ADC/DCC LIEUTENANT GS07 T100C ASP TROOPER GS07 T111C TRAINING SUPPORT CENTER MANAGER GS07 T113C DCC ASST DIVISION MANAGER GS07 T114C DCC SEX OFFENDER AFTERCARE EXAMINER GS07 U009U VETERANS CHILD WELFARE DIR GS07 V008C BUYER SUPERVISOR GS07 V011C MEDICAL BUYER GS07 X028C BD OF BARBER EXAM SECRETARY GS07 X036C ADEQ INSPECTOR SUPERVISOR GS07 X047C REAL ESTATE MANAGER GS07 X049C PROPERTY ASSESSMENT COORD MANAGER GS07 X053C INTERNAL AFFAIRS MANAGER GS07 X054C ENVIRONMENTAL PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS07 X056C CAPITAL CONFLICTS INVESTIGATOR GS07 X058C AGRI COMMODITY AREA SUPERVISOR GS07 X059C ADEQ ENFORCEMENT COORDINATOR GS07 X060C SENIOR ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH SPECIALIST GS07 X061C SECURITIES EXAMINER GS07 X065C LABOR INSPECTOR GS07 X066C INSURANCE PREMIUM TAX EXAMINER GS07 X068C ETHICS COMMISSION COMPLIANCE SPECIALIST GS07 X076C TITLE INSURANCE COMPLIANCE OFFICER GS07 X077C REAL ESTATE OFFICER GS07 X080C PROPERTY & CASUALTY COMPLIANCE OFFICER GS07 X083C INSURANCE LIFE & HEALTH COMP OFFICER GS07 X085C DFA ABC ENFORCEMENT OFFICER GS07 X090C ASP/CACD SENIOR INVESTIGATOR GS07 X091C AREC SR REAL ESTATE INVESTIGATOR GS07 X095C QUALITY ASSURANCE ANALYST GS07 X103C DENTAL EXAMINERS BD INVESTIGATOR GS07 X104C DDSSA CLAIMS ADJUDICATOR II GS07 X108C ASP DL/CDL COORDINATOR GS07 X109C AGRI INVESTIGATOR GS07 X111C AGRI INSPECTOR SUPERVISOR GS07 X112C AFHC CHIEF INVESTIGATOR GS07 X125C FRAUD INVESTIGATOR COORDINATOR GS07 X137C PAROLE BOARD INVESTIGATOR GS07 X147C AR TOWING & RECOVERY BOARD DIRECTOR GS07 X187C INVESTIGATOR GS07 X200C MEDICAID FRAUD INVESTIGATOR GS07 X208C OAL CLAIMS CENTER MANAGER GS07 X210C OAL LICENSING MANAGER GS07 A048C DIS RATE ANALYST GS06 A074C FISCAL SUPPORT SUPERVISOR GS06 A077C DFA LOCAL REVENUE OFFICE MANAGER GS06 A080C FINANCE AUTHORITY SPECIALIST GS06 A083C RETIREMENT ANALYST GS06 A084C PROGRAM/FIELD AUDIT SPECIALIST GS06 A086C BD OF ACCT FISCAL OFFICER/CPE COORD GS06 A092C DWS FIELD TAX REP GS06 A093C STATISTICIAN GS06 A114C OMIG AUDITOR GS06 A122C OAL FISCAL SPECIALIST GS06 B040C ADC AGRICULTURE PRODUCTION SUPERVISOR GS06 B059C ANRC PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS06 B073C FORENSIC TECHNICIAN SUPERVISOR GS06 B076C RESEARCH PROJECT ANALYST GS06 B078C METROLOGIST GS06 B085C PARK SUPERINTENDENT I GS06 B086C LAND MANAGEMENT SPECIALIST GS06 B087C ENERGY CONSERVATION COORD GS06 B088C COUNTY FOREST RANGER GS06 B097C NATURAL RESOURCES PROGRAM SPECIALIST GS06 C006C ARK SENTENCING COMMISSION ASST DIRECTOR GS06 C013C MEDICAL SERVICES REPRESENTATIVE GS06 C017C HEALTH ADMINISTRATIVE COORDINATOR GS06 C018C DFA EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE CMSNR GS06 C020C STUDENT APPLICATIONS SPECIALIST GS06 C026C RECORDS/INTAKE SUPERVISOR GS06 C029C HEARING OFFICER GS06 C032C DWS UI CLAIM TECHNICIAN GS06 C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST GS06 C094C ATHLETIC COMMISSION PROGRAM MANAGER GS06 D070C DIS ACCOUNTS SPECIALIST GS06 D073C ACIC FIELD AGENT GS06 D074C TELECOMMUNICATIONS SUPERVISOR GS06 D076C COMMUNICATIONS SYSTEMS SUPERVISOR GS06 E028C SIGN LANGUAGE INTERPRETER GS06 E033C DFA ORGANIZATIONAL DEVELOPMENT SPEC GS06 E037C EDUCATION PROGRAM SPECIALIST GS06 E038C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION ANALYST GS06 E039C DHS/DSB TEACHER FOR THE BLIND GS06 E043C CERTIFIED VOCATIONAL TEACHER GS06 E044C CERTIFIED BACHELORS TEACHER GS06 E045C ACIC TRAINING COORDINATOR GS06 E046C TRAINING INSTRUCTOR GS06 E047C PUBLIC HEALTH EDUCATOR GS06 E052C LIBRARIAN GS06 G122C PUBLIC DEFENDER PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS06 G123C PSC CLERK GS06 G124C OMBUDSMAN GS06 G141C ADC INDUSTRY ASSISTANT ADMR GS06 G160C WCC PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS06 G161C VICTIM/WITNESS COORDINATOR GS06 G162C SBEC ELECTION COORDINATOR GS06 G166C MILITARY PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS06 G170C DHS ADMINISTRATIVE REVIEW OFFICER GS06 G171C COORD OF AFRICAN AMERICAN HIST PRGM GS06 G172C CAREER PLANNING & PLAC COORDINATOR GS06 G175C ADEM PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS06 G178C POLICY DEVELOPMENT COORDINATOR GS06 G179C LEGAL SERVICES SPECIALIST GS06 G180C GRANTS ANALYST GS06 G184C DHS PROGRAM CONSULTANT GS06 G186C DAH PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS06 G191C ASP HIGHWAY SAFETY PROGRAM SPECIALIST GS06 G192C ACIC PROGRAM ANALYST GS06 G193C WCC PROGRAM SPECIALIST GS06 G194C PUBLIC DEFENDER INTERPRETER GS06 G198C DHS/DAAS PROGRAM SPECIALIST GS06 G199C DDSSA PROFESSIONAL RELATIONS OFFICER GS06 G202C VOLUNTEER PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS06 G204C PLANNING SPECIALIST GS06 G205C PARK PROGRAM SPECIALIST GS06 G206C LODGE SALES DIRECTOR GS06 G208C EMERGENCY PLANNER GS06 G210C DHS PROGRAM SPECIALIST GS06 G214C GRANTS SPECIALIST GS06 G217C DWS WORKFORCE SPECIALIST GS06 G230C JDDC PARALEGAL GS06 G232C ENERGY CONSERVATION MANAGER GS06 G242C DRUG COURT CASE COORDINATOR GS06 G261C OAL DRAW MANAGER GS06 L044C DHS BEHAV HLTH CASE REVIEW ANALYST GS06 L051C REHABILITATION COUNSELOR GS06 L053C HEALTH PROGRAM SPECIALIST I GS06 L058C DISEASE INTERVENTION SPECIALIST GS06 L060C REHAB INSTRUCTOR SUPERVISOR GS06 L063C FAMILY CONSUMER SCIENCE SPECIALIST GS06 L065C EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES SPEC GS06 L069C LICENSED PRACTICAL NURSE GS06 L103C PSYCHOLOGICAL EVALUATOR GS06 M038C PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY ANALYST GS06 M041C DHS/DCFS FIELD SERVICES REPRESENTATIVE GS06 M044C ASSOCIATE PROFESSIONAL COUNSELOR GS06 M045C ADULT PROTECTIVE SERVICES WORKER GS06 M047C YOUTH SERVICES ADVISOR GS06 M048C SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM LEADER GS06 M050C INTERPRETER GS06 M051C FAMILY SERVICE WORKER GS06 M052C CHILD SUPPORT SUPERVISOR I GS06 M053C CHILD CARE SERVICE SPECIALIST GS06 M054C SOCIAL SERVICE WORKER GS06 M057C CHAPLAIN GS06 M066C PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY SPECIALIST GS06 P017C TELEVISION PRODUCTION COORDINATOR GS06 P019C TRAVEL INFORMATION WRITER GS06 P021C EDITOR GS06 P023C BROADCAST PROMOTION SPECIALIST GS06 P024C ARCHIVIST GS06 P027C PUBLIC INFORMATION SPECIALIST GS06 P028C PARK INTERPRETER II GS06 P029C MUSEUM PROGRAMS SPECIALIST GS06 P031C MEDIA SPECIALIST GS06 P034C ADPT CONSULTANT GS06 P036C MUSEUM STORE MANAGER GS06 P037C MUSEUM INTERPRETIVE SPECIALIST GS06 P040C HISTORICAL RESEARCHER GS06 P041C COMMERCIAL GRAPHIC ARTIST GS06 P047C MUSEUM REGISTRAR GS06 P049C COMMERCIAL ARTIST I/GRAPHIC ART I GS06 R022C BENEFITS COORDINATOR GS06 R025C HUMAN RESOURCES ANALYST GS06 R026C CIVIL RIGHTS/EMPLOYEE RELATIONS COORD GS06 R027C BUDGET SPECIALIST GS06 R029C HUMAN RESOURCES RECRUITER GS06 R030C EEO/GRIEVANCE OFFICER GS06 R034C DFA EBD BENEFITS SPECIALIST GS06 S009C ASD/ASB TRANSPORTATION SERVICES COORD GS06 S011C ADC COMMODITY & FOOD SVC ADMR GS06 S013C ABA BUILDING/PROGRAM SUPERVISOR GS06 S014C RESTAURANT MANAGER GS06 S016C SKILLED TRADES FOREMAN GS06 S020C AVIATION TECHNICIAN GS06 S021C WATER FILTER/WASTE DISPOSAL PLNT SUPV GS06 S022C SKILLED TRADES SUPERVISOR GS06 S023C PRINT SHOP MANAGER GS06 S024C CONSTRUCTION/MAINTENANCE COORD GS06 S027C ADC INDUSTRIAL SUPERVISOR II GS06 S033C MAINTENANCE SUPERVISOR GS06 S039C TELEVISION PROGRAM SPECIALIST GS06 S095C ADC CONSTRUCTION PROJECT SPECIALIST GS06 S098C CONSTRUCTION SUPERVISOR GS06 S105C ADC INDUSTRY PROGRAM SPECIALIST GS06 T039C ADC INMATE TRANSPORTATION COORD GS06 T040C ADC ASSISTANT HEAD FARM MANAGER GS06 T041C WORK RELEASE PROGRAM SUPERVISOR GS06 T046C ASP/CACD HOTLINE SUPERVISOR GS06 T049C MILITARY FIREFIGHTER SHIFT LEADER GS06 T051C PUBLIC SAFETY SUPERVISOR GS06 T052C DHS/DBHS PUBLIC SAFETY SUPERVISOR GS06 T053C AGRICULTURE UNIT SUPERVISOR II GS06 T056C PARK RANGER II GS06 T061C SENIOR IA GS06 T062C PUBLIC SAFETY DIRECTOR GS06 T065C ADC/DCC CORRECTIONAL SERGEANT GS06 T093C DCC PAROLE/PROBATION OFFICER II GS06 T103C LAW ENFORCEMENT TRAINING INSTRUCTOR GS06 T105C PAROLE BD VICTIM INPUT COORDINATOR GS06 V010C DFA BUYER GS06 V033C DFA OSP SURPLUS PROPERTY SUPERVISOR GS06 X063C PUBLIC DEFENDER INVESTIGATOR GS06 X074C ATC AUDITOR/INVESTIGATOR GS06 X075C ADEQ ENFORCEMENT ANALYST GS06 X079C PROPERTY ASSESSMENT AUDITOR SUPERVISOR GS06 X081C PLUMBING/HVACR INSPECTOR SUPERVISOR GS06 X082C OIL & GAS INSPECTOR GS06 X084C DFA DOG RACING SUPERVISOR GS06 X087C ASBCE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR GS06 X088C EMBALMERS & FUNERAL DIR INVESTIGATOR GS06 X093C ADEQ INSPECTOR GS06 X094C SERVICES & PROGRAM LICENSING SPECIALIST GS06 X099C MOTOR VEHICLE LICENSE SUPERVISOR GS06 X101C INTERNAL AFFAIRS INVESTIGATOR GS06 X102C ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH SPECIALIST GS06 X105C CONTRACTORS LICENSING COORDINATOR GS06 X106C CAPITOL ZONING DISTRICT PLNG & PRESV DIR GS06 X107C ASP/CACD INVESTIGATOR GS06 X110C AREC INVESTIGATOR GS06 X113C VETERANS CLAIMS SPECIALIST GS06 X115C SOCIAL SECURITY ANALYST GS06 X118C PLANT BOARD INSPECTOR SUPERVISOR GS06 X120C MOTOR VEHICLE INVESTIGATOR GS06 X122C LABOR STANDARDS INVESTIGATOR GS06 X133C ADC/DCC INTERNAL AFFAIRS INVESTIGATOR GS06 X136C QUALITY ASSURANCE REVIEWER GS06 X138C FIRE PROTECTION LICENSING BOARD DIRECTOR GS06 X139C DWS UI INVESTIGATOR GS06 X140C APB ADMINISTRATIVE DIRECTOR GS06 X143C DDSSA CLAIMS ADJUDICATOR I GS06 X145C BOARD OF OPTOMETRY EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR GS06 X146C AGRI INSPECTOR III GS06 X150C AFHC INVESTIGATOR GS06 X154C PUBLIC ASSISTANCE INVESTIGATOR GS06 X156C FRAUD INVESTIGATOR GS06 X186C ADEQ AIR COMPLIANCE MONITOR GS06 X193C AHIRB EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR GS06 X196C ATC SENIOR ENFORCEMENT AGENT GS06 X198C RACING COMMISSION INVESTIGATOR GS06 X209C OAL SECURITY SPECIALIST GS06 A088C ASSETS COORDINATOR GS05 A090C PAYROLL SERVICES SPECIALIST GS05 A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST GS05 A094C DFA LOCAL REVENUE OFFICE SUPERVISOR GS05 A099C CREDIT & COLLECTIONS SUPV GS05 B083C ASP AFIS COORDINATOR GS05 B090C ENGINEER TECHNICIAN GS05 B093C LAND RESOURCE SPECIALIST GS05 B094C FORENSIC TECHNICIAN GS05 B098C FOREST RANGER II GS05 B100C ARCHITECTURAL DRAFTSMAN GS05 B105C FARM FOREMAN — INST GS05 B108C LABORATORY COORDINATOR GS05 B109C SURVEY CREW CHIEF GS05 B120C FARM MAINTENANCE MECHANIC GS05 C008C STADIUM COMMISSION OFFICE MANAGER GS05 C012C PUBLIC DEFENDER SUPPORT SVCS SPECIALIST GS05 C016C INSURANCE ADMINISTRATIVE COORDINATOR GS05 C021C ADPT ARCHIVAL MICROPHOTO SUPV GS05 C022C BUSINESS OPERATIONS SPECIALIST GS05 C024C ADC/DCC RECORDS SUPERVISOR GS05 C027C ADPT WELCOME CENTER MANAGER II GS05 C028C MEDICAL RECORDS SUPERVISOR GS05 C030C HEALTH RECORDS SPECIALIST GS05 C035C ASST REGISTRAR GS05 C036C ADMINISTRATIVE REVIEW ANALYST GS05 C038C ADEM EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT DUTY OFFICER GS05 C040C LEASING SPECIALIST GS05 C042C DFA REVENUE SUPERVISOR GS05 C047C FRONT DESK SUPERVISOR GS05 C050C ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT SUPERVISOR GS05 C054C LOCAL OFFICE ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST GS05 C092C JDDC LEGAL/ADMIN SECRETARY GS05 C096C ADPT OFFICE MANAGER III GS05 D077C HELP DESK SPECIALIST GS05 D081C TELECOMMUNICATIONS SPECIALIST GS05 D085C COMMUNICATIONS SUPERVISOR GS05 D087C DATABASE COORD/BUSINESS LICENSE ANALYST GS05 E049C VOCATIONAL INSTRUCTOR GS05 E050C LIBRARY SUPERVISOR GS05 E051C STAFF DEVELOPMENT SPECIALIST GS05 E054C ADC/DCC UNIT TRAINER GS05 E055C DAY CARE TEACHER GS05 G187C CREDENTIALING COORDINATION SUPERVISOR GS05 G200C CLASSIFICATION & ASSIGNMENT OFFICER GS05 G201C WCC CLAIMS ANALYST GS05 G207C FINANCIAL AID ANALYST GS05 G215C CAREER PLANNING & PLACEMENT SPECIALIST GS05 G216C ADC INMATE GRIEVANCE COORDINATOR GS05 G218C STUDENT RECRUITMENT SPECIALIST GS05 G220C DWS UNIT SUPERVISOR GS05 G236C DHS/DOV AREA COORDINATOR GS05 G237C VETERANS CEMETERY MANAGER GS05 L066C REHABILITATION INSTRUCTOR GS05 L070C HEALTH CARE ANALYST GS05 L071C DENTAL HYGIENIST GS05 L072C ADC HIV/AIDS EDUCATOR GS05 M004C RESIDENTIAL OPERATIONS MANAGER GS05 M056C MILITARY HOUSING MANAGER GS05 M058C ADC/DCC PROGRAM SPECIALIST GS05 M059C ADC/DCC ADVISOR GS05 M060C YOUTH PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS05 M061C VOCATIONAL REHAB EVALUATOR GS05 M064C RESIDENTIAL ACTIVITIES SUPERVISOR GS05 M065C RECREATIONAL ACTIVITY SUPERVISOR GS05 M067C CHILD SUPPORT SPECIALIST II GS05 M068C CHILD SUPPORT SPECIALIST I GS05 M072C RECREATION COORDINATOR GS05 M091C ARNG YOUTH PROGRAM SHIFT LEADER GS05 P026C RADIO PROGRAM DIRECTOR GS05 P035C PARK INTERPRETER GS05 P042C BROADCAST PRODUCTION SPECIALIST GS05 P044C ADC SALES REPRESENTATIVE GS05 P046C PHOTOGRAPHER GS05 Q112U GOV OFC HOUSEKEEPER SUPERVISOR GS05 R031C INSTITUTION HUMAN RESOURCES COORDINATOR GS05 R032C HUMAN RESOURCES PROGRAM REPRESENTATIVE GS05 R033C BENEFITS ANALYST GS05 S018C HVACR MECHANICAL INSPECTOR GS05 S025C BUILDING AND GROUNDS COORDINATOR GS05 S026C ADC/DCC ASST MAINTENANCE SUPERVISOR GS05 S028C SCHOOL BUS DRIVER TRAINER GS05 S030C WATER FILTER/WASTE DISPOSAL PLNT OPER GS05 S031C SKILLED TRADESMAN GS05 S032C PRINT SHOP SUPERVISOR GS05 S034C INTERSTATE TRUCK DRIVER GS05 S035C FABRICATION SHOP MANAGER GS05 S036C AUTO/DIESEL MECHANIC SUPERVISOR GS05 S038C TRANSIT OPERATIONS SUPERVISOR GS05 S041C BOILER OPERATOR GS05 S048C ASST RESTAURANT MANAGER GS05 S049C LODGE HOUSEKEEPING SUPERVISOR GS05 S069C RADIO DISPATCH OPERATOR GS05 S102C PARK SPECIALIST III GS05 T055C PUBLIC SAFETY OFFICER GS05 T058C AGRICULTURE UNIT SUPERVISOR I GS05 T059C ADC/DCC FOOD PREPARATION MANAGER GS05 T060C SENIOR MILITARY FIREFIGHTER GS05 T063C PARK RANGER GS05 T064C CIVIL AIR PATROL SVCS COORD GS05 T067C PUBLIC SAFETY OFFICER II GS05 T068C FIRING RANGE SPECIALIST GS05 T069C BOMB TECHNICIAN GS05 T071C ADC UNIT TRAINING SUPERVISOR GS05 T075C ADC/DCC CORPORAL GS05 T076C ADC/DCC ADMIN REVIEW OFFICER GS05 T092C DCC PAROLE/PROBATION OFFICER I GS05 T115C DCC INSTITUTIONAL RELEASE MANAGER GS05 V012C FEDERAL SURPLUS PROPERTY SUPERVISOR GS05 V013C CENTRAL WAREHOUSE OPERATIONS MGR GS05 V014C BUYER GS05 V015C PURCHASING SPECIALIST GS05 V018C WAREHOUSE MANAGER GS05 X078C PSC UTILITIES SERVICES SPECIALIST GS05 X096C PLUMBING INSPECTOR GS05 X097C AGRI SPECIALIST GS05 X100C LP GAS INSPECTOR GS05 X114C SR AGRI COMMODITY COMPLIANCE INSPECTOR GS05 X116C SCHOOL BUS TRANS INSPECTOR GS05 X117C PROPERTY ASSESSMENT AUDITOR GS05 X119C OCCUPATIONAL SAFETY COORDINATOR GS05 X121C MANUFACTURED HOUSING SPEC SUPV GS05 X123C INSURANCE INVESTIGATOR GS05 X124C HEALTH FACILITY REVIEWER GS05 X127C DISCIPLINARY HEARING OFFICER GS05 X128C CORRECTIONAL UNIT ACCREDITATION SPEC GS05 X129C CONSTRUCTION INSPECTOR GS05 X130C BD OF COLLECTION FIELD INVESTIGATOR GS05 X131C ATC ENFORCEMENT AGENT GS05 X132C AGRI COMMODITY COMPLIANCE INSPECTOR GS05 X142C DFA RACING COMMISSION JUDGE GS05 X151C SAFETY SUPERVISOR GS05 X157C AGRI INSPECTOR II GS05 X163C QUALITY ASSURANCE TECHNICIAN GS05 X173C PEST CONTROL TECHNICIAN SUPERVISOR GS05 X191C MASSAGE THERAPY INSPECTOR GS05 X201C DDSSA ADJUDICATIVE SPECIALIST GS05 X213C OAL LICENSING SPECIALIST GS05 A097C PAYROLL TECHNICIAN GS04 A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST GS04 A100C PAYROLL OFFICER GS04 A101C ACCOUNTING TECHNICIAN GS04 A102C FISCAL SUPPORT TECHNICIAN GS04 A104C DFA RACING COMMISSION OFFICE AUDITOR GS04 B092C SEED ANALYST SUPERVISOR GS04 B096C AGRI SEED ANALYST GS04 B101C NATURAL RESOURCES PROGRAM TECHNICIAN GS04 B102C FOREST RANGER I GS04 B103C AGS SPECIALIST GS04 B106C RESEARCH ASSISTANT GS04 B111C LABORATORY TECHNICIAN GS04 C014C MEDICAL EXAMINER CASE COORDINATOR GS04 C039C ADPT OFFICE MANAGER II GS04 C043C RECORDS MANAGEMENT ANALYST GS04 C044C MEDICAL BILLING SPECIALIST GS04 C045C LICENSING COORDINATOR GS04 C046C LEGAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST GS04 C048C DFA SUPERVISOR GS04 C049C DDSSA ADJUDICATIVE ASSISTANT GS04 C052C ADPT OFFICE MANAGER I GS04 C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III GS04 C057C ADMINISTRATION SUPPORT SPECIALIST GS04 C072C ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT SPECIALIST GS04 C083C MAIL SERVICES COORDINATOR GS04 C091C ADPT WELCOME CENTER MANAGER I GS04 C098C RACING COMMISSION ASSISTANT SUPERVISOR GS04 D086C CALL CENTER ANALYST GS04 D088C EMERGENCY COMMUNICATION SPECIALIST GS04 G219C LOGISTICS MANAGER GS04 G221C VEHICLE FACILITIES COORD GS04 L073C LACTATION CONSULTANT GS04 L074C THERAPY ASSISTANT GS04 L077C HEALTH SERVICES SPECIALIST II GS04 L078C FAMILY SERVICES ASSISTANT GS04 L081C DENTAL ASSISTANT GS04 L102C DIETETIC SPECIALIST GS04 M063C RESIDENTIAL CARE PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS04 M069C YOUTH SERVICES TECHNICIAN GS04 M073C RESIDENTIAL CARE SUPERVISOR GS04 M077C COORDINATOR OF HOUSEKEEPING GS04 P043C ARCHIVAL ASSISTANT GS04 P048C MULTI-MEDIA SPECIALIST GS04 P057C LIVESTOCK NEWS REPORTER GS04 R036C HUMAN RESOURCES SPECIALIST GS04 R037C BENEFITS TECHNICIAN GS04 R038C HUMAN RESOURCES ASSISTANT GS04 S037C ABA BUILDING MAINTENANCE SPECIALIST GS04 S040C CALIBRATION TECHNICIAN GS04 S043C ADC INDUSTRIAL SUPERVISOR I GS04 S044C FOOD PREPARATION MANAGER GS04 S046C MAINTENANCE TECHNICIAN GS04 S047C LANDSCAPE SUPERVISOR GS04 S051C INSTRUMENTATION TECHNICIAN GS04 S052C HEAVY EQUIPMENT SPECIALIST GS04 S053C AUTO/DIESEL MECHANIC GS04 S061C CHDC LAUNDRY OPERATIONS MANAGER GS04 S099C STATIONARY ENGINEER GS04 S104C ADPT HOUSEKEEPER SUPERVISOR GS04 T066C MILITARY FIREFIGHTER GS04 T070C ADC/DCC FOOD PREPARATION SUPERVISOR GS04 T072C SECURITY OFFICER SUPERVISOR GS04 T074C ASP/CACD HOTLINE OPERATOR GS04 T077C ADC MAILROOM SERVICES COORDINATOR GS04 T079C FACILITY MANAGER II GS04 T083C ADC/DCC CORRECTIONAL OFFICER I GS04 T102C ASP CACD SR. HOTLINE OPERATOR GS04 V016C COMMODITY SPECIALIST GS04 V017C COMMISSARY COORDINATOR GS04 V019C SURPLUS PROPERTY SPECIALIST GS04 V020C INVENTORY CONTROL MANAGER GS04 V021C SURPLUS PROPERTY AGENT GS04 V022C PURCHASING TECHNICIAN GS04 V023C STOREROOM SUPERVISOR GS04 V025C WAREHOUSE SPECIALIST GS04 X098C OIL & GAS TECHNICIAN GS04 X149C AGRI COMMODITY COMPLIANCE SPECIALIST GS04 X152C REAL PROPERTY MANAGEMENT SPECIALIST GS04 X153C REAL ESTATE ANALYST GS04 X155C MANUFACTURED HOUSING SPEC GS04 X160C ASP USED MOTOR VEHICLE INSPECTOR GS04 X165C AGRI INSPECTOR I GS04 X167C COMPLAINTS INVESTIGATOR GS04 X168C BAIL BONDSMAN BOARD INVESTIGATOR GS04 X169C AREC EXAMINER GS04 X174C COSMETOLOGY INSPECTOR GS04 X177C PEST CONTROL TECHNICIAN GS04 X179C ASP COMMERCIAL DRIVER LICENSE EXAMINER GS04 X181C COLLECTOR GS04 X182C ASP DRIVERS LICENSE EXAMINER GS04 X189C ASP AFIS TECHNICIAN GS04 X195C ELECTRONICS SECURITY SYSTEMS SENIOR TECH GS04 X212C OAL SECURITY SUPPORT SPECIALIST GS04 X214C OAL CLAIMS ASSISTANT GS04 A095C PSC TAX DIV VALUATION ANALYST GS03 A096C COLLECTION OFFICER GS03 A111C RACING COMMISSION COLLECTOR GS03 B110C VETERINARIAN ASSISTANT GS03 B113C RESEARCH TECHNICIAN GS03 B114C RESEARCH FIELD TECHNICIAN GS03 B129C RACING COMMISSION VETERINARIAN ASSISTANT GS03 C053C MEDICAL RECORDS TECHNICIAN GS03 C058C EDUCATION PARAPROFESSIONAL GS03 C059C DFA SERVICE REPRESENTATIVE GS03 C062C LOCAL OFFICE ADMINISTRATIVE ASSISTANT GS03 C066C PATIENT ACCOUNT SPECIALIST GS03 C067C ADPT WELCOME CENTER ASSISTANT MANAGER GS03 C068C RETAIL SPECIALIST GS03 C069C LIBRARY TECHNICIAN GS03 C070C DUPLICATION ASSISTANT GS03 C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II GS03 C074C MEDICAL RECORDS ASSISTANT GS03 C099C RACING COMMISSION LICENSING CLERK GS03 C105C OAL RECEPTIONIST GS03 D090C COMPUTER PUBLISHING OPERATOR GS03 D091C COMPUTER LAB TECHNICIAN GS03 E053C AUDIOVISUAL AIDS SUPV GS03 E058C LIBRARY SPECIALIST GS03 L082C CERTIFIED NURSING ASSISTANT GS03 L083C HEALTH SERVICES SPECIALIST I GS03 L092C ATHLETIC TRAINER GS03 M070C YOUTH PROGRAM SPECIALIST GS03 M071C RESIDENTIAL CARE SHIFT COORDINATOR GS03 M074C RESIDENTIAL ADVISOR GS03 M078C VOLUNTEER SERVICES COORDINATOR GS03 M081C RESIDENTIAL CARE SHIFT SUPERVISOR GS03 M084C BEHAV HLTH AIDE GS03 M090C DHS PROGRAM ASSISTANT GS03 P039C INSTITUTIONAL PRINTER GS03 P045C PUBLIC INFORMATION TECHNICIAN GS03 P054C ASST LODGE SALES DIRECTOR GS03 P056C MUSEUM PROGRAM ASSISTANT II GS03 S045C PRINTING ESTIMATOR/PLANNER GS03 S050C MAINTENANCE SPECIALIST GS03 S054C PRINTER GS03 S056C FOOD PREPARATION SUPERVISOR GS03 S057C LANDSCAPE SPECIALIST GS03 S058C EQUIPMENT MECHANIC GS03 S059C LODGE COOK GS03 S063C INNKEEPER SPECIALIST GS03 S064C SKILLED TRADES HELPER GS03 S067C HOUSEKEEPER SUPERVISOR GS03 S076C INSTITUTIONAL BEAUTICIAN GS03 S081C APPRENTICE TRADESMAN GS03 S097C CONSTRUCTION SPECIALIST GS03 S101C PARK SPECIALIST II GS03 S103C ADPT HOUSEKEEPER GS03 T078C MILITARY FIRE & POLICE OFFICER GS03 T081C COMMISSARY MANAGER GS03 T082C ASP EXECUTIVE SECURITY GUARD GS03 T084C PUBLIC SAFETY SECURITY OFFICER GS03 T085C FACILITY MANAGER I GS03 T087C SECURITY OFFICER GS03 V024C ADC PROPERTY OFFICER GS03 V027C INVENTORY CONTROL TECHNICIAN GS03 X126C EMBALMERS & FUNERAL DIR INSPECTOR GS03 X159C BD OF BARBER EXAM INSPECTOR GS03 X161C ASP INVESTIGATOR SPECIALIST GS03 X162C AGRI COMMODITY GRADER II GS03 X164C PLANT BOARD INSPECTOR GS03 X166C FIRE PROT LIC BRD INSPECTOR/INVESTIGATOR GS03 X170C AR TOWING & RECOVERY BD INVESTIGATOR GS03 X171C AGRI COMMODITY SPECIALIST I GS03 X172C TAX INVESTIGATOR GS03 X175C BD OF ACCT CREDENTIALING COORD/EXAM SPEC GS03 X176C BD OF ACCT ADMIN ASST/LICENSING SPEC GS03 X180C INSURANCE LICENSING TECHNICIAN GS03 X183C DWS CLAIMS ADJUDICATOR GS03 X184C OPTICIANS' BOARD SECRETARY TREASURER GS03 X188C FIRE MARSHAL INSPECTOR GS03 X194C ELECTRONICS SECURITY SYSTEMS TECH GS03 X199C RACING COMMISSION JUDGE GS03 B115C AGRI FARM TECHNICIAN GS02 B116C AGRI LABORATORY TECHNICIAN GS02 B130C RACING COMMISSION WALKER GS02 C076C DFA TECHNICIAN GS02 C080C CREDENTIALING ASSISTANT GS02 C082C REGISTRAR'S ASSISTANT GS02 C084C MAIL SERVICES SPECIALIST GS02 C085C LIBRARY SUPPORT ASSISTANT GS02 C086C DESK CLERK GS02 C087C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST I GS02 C088C MAIL SERVICES ASSISTANT GS02 D092C CALL CENTER SPECIALIST GS02 E056C TEACHER ASSISTANT GS02 E057C AUDIOVISUAL LABORATORY ASSISTANT GS02 L075C ORTHOTIST AIDE GS02 L084C THERAPY AIDE GS02 L085C PHYSICAL THERAPY AIDE GS02 L088C NURSING AIDE/NURSING ASST I GS02 M076C RECREATIONAL ACTIVITY LEADER II GS02 M083C RESIDENTIAL CARE TECHNICIAN GS02 P055C SPECIAL EVENTS SUPERVISOR GS02 P060C MULTI-MEDIA TECHNICIAN GS02 P061C TRAVEL CONSULTANT GS02 P062C ARCHIVAL TECHNICIAN GS02 P064C MUSEUM PROGRAM ASSISTANT I GS02 S060C HEAVY EQUIPMENT OPERATOR GS02 S062C INSTITUTIONAL BUS DRIVER GS02 S066C LANDSCAPE TECHNICIAN GS02 S068C FOOD PREPARATION COORDINATOR GS02 S070C EQUIPMENT TECHNICIAN GS02 S082C CANTEEN SUPERVISOR GS02 S083C BAKER GS02 S084C INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES SUPERVISOR GS02 S085C FOOD PREPARATION SPECIALIST GS02 S088C KITCHEN ASSISTANT GS02 T086C FIRE & SAFETY COORDINATOR GS02 T101C RACING COMMISSION SECURITY GATEMAN GS02 U051U CLAIMS COMMISSIONER GS02 V028C WAREHOUSE WORKER GS02 V030C SHIPPING & RECEIVING CLERK GS02 X178C FINGERPRINT TECHNICIAN GS02 X185C ABSTRACTORS BOARD SECRETARY GENERAL GS02 B112C GREENHOUSE TECHNICIAN GS01 B118C FARM WORKER GS01 B119C LAB ASSISTANT GS01 C078C CASHIER GS01 C089C LIBRARY TECHNICAL ASSISTANT GS01 L086C PHARMACY ASSISTANT GS01 M082C RECREATIONAL ACTIVITY LEADER I GS01 M085C CAREGIVER GS01 M089C RESIDENTIAL CARE ASSISTANT GS01 S065C MAINTENANCE ASSISTANT GS01 S072C STADIUM COMMISSION CUSTODIAN GS01 S073C HOUSEKEEPER GS01 S079C REPROD EQUIPMENT OPERATOR GS01 S080C EQUIPMENT OPERATOR GS01 S086C COOK GS01 S087C INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES ASSISTANT GS01 S089C FOOD PREPARATION TECHNICIAN GS01 S090C WAITRESS/WAITER GS01 S091C PARK AIDE GS01 S100C PARK SPECIALIST I GS01 T091C WATCHMAN GS01 V029C PURCHASING ASSISTANT GS01 V031C STOCK CLERK GS01 X141C DIETETICS LICENSING BOARD SECRETARY GS01